Utah statutes.
75-5-307.   Removal or resignation of guardian -- Termination of incapacity.
(1)  On petition of the ward or any person interested in the ward's welfare,
the court may remove a guardian and appoint a successor if in the best
interests of the ward.  On petition of the guardian, the court may accept the
guardian's resignation and make any other order which may be appropriate.
(2)  An order adjudicating incapacity may specify a minimum period, not
exceeding one year, during which no petition for an adjudication that the ward
is no longer incapacitated may be filed without special leave.  Subject to
this restriction, the ward or any person interested in the ward's welfare may
petition for an order that the ward is no longer incapacitated and for removal
or resignation of the guardian.  A request for this order may be made by
informal letter to the court or judge and any person who knowingly interferes
with transmission of this kind of request to the court or judge may be
adjudged guilty of contempt of court.
(3)  Before removing a guardian, accepting the resignation of a guardian, or
ordering that a ward's incapacity has terminated, the court shall follow the
same procedures to safeguard the rights of the ward as apply to a petition for
appointment of a guardian as provided under Section 75-5-303.
